Massachusetts, session 194th, H1947.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 7 of chapter 185C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
A landlord that is a limited liability company formed pursuant to chapter 156C, and
which owns and leases 10 or fewer residential dwelling units, may be represented in proceedings
under this chapter by one of its officers or managers, regardless of whether the officer or
manager is an attorney licensed to practice law; provided, that separate limited liability
companies that share any of the same officers or managers shall be considered a single limited
liability company for the purposes of calculating the number of properties owned and leased
pursuant to this section.
of 1